Utah statutes.
76-10-103.   Permitting minors to use tobacco in place of business.

It is a class C misdemeanor for the proprietor of any place of business to knowingly permit persons under age 19 to frequent a place of business while they are using tobacco.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

